Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 96.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
86-127
Nebraska Competitive
Telephone Marketplace Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)
One of the goals of the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, as such act
existed on January 1, 2002, is to foster competition among telephone companies.
Section 271 of the federal act (a) establishes specific incentives, procedures,
and requirements for regional Bell operating companies to offer inter-LATA
interexchange service and (b) requires the Public Service Commission to monitor
the competitive performance of a regional Bell operating company and to consult
with the Federal Communications Commission regarding such activities.

(2) The Nebraska Competitive Telephone Marketplace Fund is
created. The Public Service Commission may accept, and the fund shall consist
of, any voluntary performance payments received from a regional Bell operating
company. The fund shall be used by the commission for expenses related to
the monitoring of compliance with section 271 of the federal act. If money
in the fund exceeds thirty thousand dollars, the commission shall remit such
excess money to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Internet Enhancement
Fund, except that transfers
may be made from the Nebraska Competitive Telephone Marketplace Fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in
the Nebraska Competitive Telephone Marketplace Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 11;

Laws 2008, LB755, § 6;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 96.

Certificates for inter-LATA interexchange services, see section 86-129.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.